Montana, session 2025, HB828.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Short title. [Sections 1 through 5] may be cited as the "Powered
Wheelchair Right to Repair Act".

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Definitions. As used in [sections 1 through 5], the following definitions
apply:
(1) "Authorized repair provider" means:
(a) an original equipment manufacturer who offers the services of diagnosis, maintenance, or
repair of its own powered wheelchair; or
(b) an individual or business who offers the services of diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of a
powered wheelchair under the name of the original equipment manufacturer as part of an agreement with the
manufacturer.
(2) "Documentation" means a manual, diagram, reporting output, service code description,
schematic diagram, security code, password, or other guidance or information used in effecting the services of
diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of a powered wheelchair.
(3) "Independent repair provider" means an individual or business operating in the state that does
not have an arrangement described in subsection (1)(b) with an original equipment manufacturer and who is
engaged in the services of diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of a powered wheelchair.
(4) "Original equipment manufacturer" means a business that sells, leases, or otherwise supplies
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 828

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 828.1
new powered wheelchairs manufactured by or on behalf of itself.
(5) "Owner" means an individual or business who owns or leases a powered wheelchair purchased
or used in the state.
(6) "Part" means a new or used replacement part made available by an original equipment
manufacturer for the maintenance or repair of a powered wheelchair manufactured by or on behalf of or sold or
otherwise supplied by the original equipment manufacturer.
(7) "Powered wheelchair" means a motorized wheeled device designed for use by a person with a
physical disability.
(8) "Tools" means a software program, hardware implement, or other apparatus used for the
diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of a powered wheelchair, including software or other mechanisms that
provision, program, or pair a new part, calibrate functionality, access and reset electronic security locks and
other security-related functions, or perform any other function required to bring the product back to fully
functional condition, including installing updates.

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Responsibilities and duties of powered wheelchair manufacturers.
(1) The original equipment manufacturer shall provide an independent repair provider or owner with
documentation, parts, and tools in a way that enables the efficient and cost-effective diagnosis, maintenance,
and repair of powered wheelchairs that are sold or used in the state.
(2) For powered wheelchairs that contain electronic security locks or other security functions, the
original equipment manufacturer shall make available to an independent repair provider or owner
documentation, parts, and tools needed to access and reset the security lock or security function when disabled
to facilitate diagnosis, maintenance, or repair. The documentation, parts, and tools may be made available
through appropriate secure release systems.
(3) Documentation, tools, and parts must be made available either by the original equipment
manufacturer or through an authorized repair provider under the following fair and reasonable terms:
(a) There may be a charge for the actual cost of preparing and sending a physical printed copy of
documentation. Electronic copies of documentation must be made available free of charge.
(b) There may be a charge for the actual cost of preparing and sending a tool in physical form.
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 828

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 828.1
Otherwise, tools must be made available at no charge and without requiring authorization or internet access for
the use or operation of a tool.
(c) Original equipment manufacturers shall make parts available to an independent repair provider
or owner at costs and terms that are equivalent to the most favorable costs and terms that an original
equipment manufacturer offers the parts to an authorized repair provider and that:
(i) account for any discount, rebate, convenient and timely means of delivery, means of enabling
fully restored and updated functionality, rights of use, or other incentive or preference the original manufacturer
offers to an authorized repair provider;
(ii) account for any additional cost, burden, or impediment the original equipment manufacturer
imposes on an independent repair provider or owner;
(iii) do not impose a substantial obligation or restriction that is not reasonably necessary for the
diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of a powered wheelchair; and
(iv) are not conditioned on an arrangement with an authorized repair provider as defined in [section
2].

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Enforcement. A violation of any of the provisions of [sections 1 through
5] is an unlawful practice under the Montana Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Act, Title 30,
chapter 14, part 1.

NEW SECTION. Section 5. Limitations. (1) Nothing in [sections 1 through 5] may be construed to
require an original equipment manufacturer to divulge a trade secret to an independent repair provider or
owner.
(2) Nothing in [sections 1 through 5] may be construed to alter the terms of any arrangement
between an authorized repair provider and an original equipment manufacturer.
(3) An original equipment manufacturer or an authorized repair provider may not be liable for any
damage or injury caused to a powered wheelchair by an independent repair provider or owner that occurs
during the course of diagnosis, maintenance, or repair.

- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 828

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 828.1
NEW SECTION. Section 6. Codification instruction. [Sections 1 through 5] are intended to be
codified as a new part in Title 30, chapter 14, and the provisions of Title 30, chapter 14, apply to [sections 1
through 5].

NEW SECTION. Section 7. Effective date. [This act] is effective January 1, 2026.
- END -
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – HB 828